Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.130

When adverse party becomes bound.

When notice of the application for an injunction has been served upon the adverse party, it shall not be necessary to serve the order upon him or her, but he or she shall be bound by the injunction as soon as the bond required of the plaintiff is executed and delivered to the proper officer.

[ 2011 c 336 s 199; Code 1881 s 164; 1877 p 34 s 164; 1869 p 40 s 162; 1854 p 154 s 122; RRS s 730.]